District of Columbia statutes.
45-305

Effective date.

This chapter shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1); provided, that this chapter shall not take effect prior to March 31, 1981.

Feb. 26, 1981, D.C. Law 3-119, § 7, 27 DCR 5641
1981 Ed., § 49-405.